Washington statutes.
RCW 43.42.900

Jurisdiction of energy facility site evaluation council not affected.

Nothing in this chapter affects the jurisdiction of the energy facility site evaluation council under chapter 80.50 RCW.

[ 2002 c 153 s 11.]